Washington statutes.
RCW 35.33.041

Budget estimates—Classification and segregation.

All estimates of receipts and expenditures for the ensuing year shall be fully detailed in the annual budget and shall be classified and segregated according to a standard classification of accounts to be adopted and prescribed by the state auditor after consultation with the Washington finance officers association, the association of Washington cities and the association of Washington city managers.

[ 1995 c 301 s 40; 1969 ex.s. c 95 s 4.]